Texas statutes.
HEALTH AND SAFETY CODE

TITLE 7. MENTAL HEALTH AND INTELLECTUAL DISABILITY

SUBTITLE C. TEXAS MENTAL HEALTH CODE

CHAPTER 575. ADMISSION AND TRANSFER PROCEDURES FOR INPATIENT SERVICES

SUBCHAPTER A. ADMISSION PROCEDURES

Sec. 575.001. AUTHORIZATION FOR ADMISSION. (a) The facility administrator of an inpatient mental health facility may admit and detain a patient under the procedures prescribed by this subtitle.

(b) The facility administrator of an inpatient mental health facility operated by a community center or other entity the department designates to provide mental health services may not admit or detain a patient under an order for temporary or extended court-ordered mental health services unless the facility is licensed under Chapter 577.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 575.002. ADMISSION OF VOLUNTARY PATIENT TO PRIVATE MENTAL HOSPITAL. This subtitle does not prohibit the voluntary admission of a patient to a private mental hospital in any lawful manner.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 575.003. ADMISSION OF PERSONS WITH CHEMICAL DEPENDENCY AND PERSONS CHARGED WITH CRIMINAL OFFENSE. This subtitle does not affect the admission to a state mental health facility of:

(1) a person with a chemical dependency admitted under Chapter 462; or

(2) a person charged with a criminal offense admitted under Subchapter D or E, Chapter 46B, Code of Criminal Procedure.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 35, Sec. 13, eff. Jan. 1, 2004.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1385, eff. April 2, 2015.

SUBCHAPTER B. TRANSFER PROCEDURES

Sec. 575.011. TRANSFER TO DEPARTMENT MENTAL HEALTH FACILITY OR LOCAL MENTAL HEALTH AUTHORITY. (a) The department may transfer a patient, if the transfer is considered advisable, from an inpatient mental health facility operated by the department to:

(1) another inpatient mental health facility operated by the department; or

(2) a mental health facility deemed suitable by the local mental health authority if the authority consents.

(b) A local mental health authority may transfer a patient from one authority facility to another if the transfer is considered advisable.

(c) A voluntary patient may not be transferred under Subsection (a) or (b) without the patient's consent.

(d) The facility administrator of an inpatient mental health facility may, for any reason, transfer an involuntary patient to a mental health facility deemed suitable by the local mental health authority for the area.

(e) The facility administrator shall notify the committing court and the local mental health authority before transferring a patient under Subsection (d).

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 367, Sec. 16, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 575.012. TRANSFER OF PERSON WITH AN INTELLECTUAL DISABILITY TO AN INPATIENT MENTAL HEALTH FACILITY OPERATED BY THE DEPARTMENT. (a) An inpatient mental health facility may not transfer a patient who is also a person with an intellectual disability to a department mental health facility unless, before initiating the transfer, the facility administrator of the inpatient mental health facility obtains from the commissioner a determination that space is available in a department facility unit that is specifically designed to serve such a person.

(b) The department shall maintain an appropriate number of hospital-level beds for persons with an intellectual disability who are committed for court-ordered mental health services to meet the needs of the local mental health authorities. The number of beds the department maintains must be determined according to the previous year's need.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 367, Sec. 17, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1386, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 575.013. TRANSFER OF PERSON WITH AN INTELLECTUAL DISABILITY TO STATE SUPPORTED LIVING CENTER. (a) The facility administrator of an inpatient mental health facility operated by the department may transfer an involuntary patient in the facility to a state supported living center for persons with an intellectual disability if:

(1) an examination of the patient indicates that the patient has symptoms of an intellectual disability to the extent that training, education, rehabilitation, care, treatment, and supervision in a state supported living center are in the patient's best interest;

(2) the director of the state supported living center to which the patient is to be transferred agrees to the transfer; and

(3) the facility administrator coordinates the transfer with the director of that state supported living center.

(b) A certificate containing the diagnosis and the facility administrator's recommendation of transfer to a specific state supported living center shall be furnished to the committing court.

(c) The patient may not be transferred before the judge of the committing court enters an order approving the transfer.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 367, Sec. 18, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1387, eff. April 2, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1388, eff. April 2, 2015.

Sec. 575.014. TRANSFER TO PRIVATE MENTAL HOSPITAL. The hospital administrator of a private mental hospital may transfer a patient to another private mental hospital, or the department may transfer a patient to a private mental hospital, at no expense to the state if:

(1) the patient or the patient's guardian or next friend signs an application requesting the transfer at the patient's or applicant's expense;

(2) the hospital administrator of the private mental hospital to which the person is to be transferred agrees in writing to admit the patient and to accept responsibility for the patient as prescribed by this subtitle; and

(3) written notice of the transfer is sent to the committing court.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 575.015. TRANSFER TO FEDERAL FACILITY. The department or the hospital administrator of a private mental hospital may transfer an involuntary patient to a federal agency if:

(1) the federal agency sends notice that facilities are available and that the patient is eligible for care or treatment in a facility;

(2) notice of the transfer is sent to the committing court; and

(3) the committing court enters an order approving the transfer.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 575.016. TRANSFER FROM FACILITY OF TEXAS DEPARTMENT OF CRIMINAL JUSTICE. (a) The Texas Department of Criminal Justice shall transfer a patient committed to an inpatient mental health facility under Section 574.044 to a noncorrectional mental health facility on the day the inmate is released on parole or mandatory supervision.

(b) A patient transferred to a department mental health facility shall be transferred as prescribed by Section 575.011 or 575.012 to the facility that serves the location to which the patient is released on parole or mandatory supervision.

(c) The mental health facility to which a patient is transferred under this section is solely responsible for the patient's treatment.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 25.110, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 87 (S.B. 1969), Sec. 25.111, eff. September 1, 2009.

Sec. 575.017. TRANSFER OF RECORDS. The facility administrator of the transferring inpatient mental health facility shall send the patient's appropriate hospital records, or a copy of the records, to the hospital or facility administrator of the mental hospital or state supported living center to which the patient is transferred.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 76, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Amended by:

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1 (S.B. 219), Sec. 3.1389, eff. April 2, 2015.